Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [103G.220] WETLAND RESTORATION AND PROTECTION GOAL. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Goal. new text end new text begin It is the goal of the state to restore or permanently protect no fewer than 1 million acres of lost or significantly degraded wetlands between the effective date of this section and 2050. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Duty of state agencies. new text end new text begin A state agency that administers grant programs or otherwise has discretion over the use of appropriated money that could be spent in a manner that contributes to achieving the goal in subdivision 1 must include consideration of opportunities to contribute toward the achievement of that goal in its grant award and other applicable decision-making processes. Preference for wetlands to be restored or permanently protected must be directed to counties that have lost more than 50 percent of their prestatehood wetlands as of the effective date of this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin By January 1, 2027, and each January 1 thereafter, the Board of Water and Soil Resources must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees having jurisdiction over environment policy and finance on the status of efforts to achieve the goal in subdivision 1. The report must identify and quantify where wetlands have been protected and restored, where they may be protected and restored in the future, and any obstacles to achieving the goal in subdivision 1. new text end